Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.37 Primary care providers ââ insurance requirements. 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âCovered benefitsâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. c. âDirect primary care agreementâ means an agreement between a primary care provider and a covered person, or the covered personâs representative, in which the primary care provider agrees to provide health care services for a specified period of time to the covered person for a service charge. House File 2434, p. 2 d. âHealth benefit planâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. e. âHealth care professionalâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. f. âHealth care servicesâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. g. âHealth carrierâ means the same as defined in section 514J.102. h. âPrimary care providerâ means a health care professional trained to serve as the first contact and to provide continuous and comprehensive care to a covered person, and includes but is not limited to any of the following licensed or certified health care professionals who provide primary care: (1) A physician who is a family or general practitioner, a pediatrician, an internist, an obstetrician, or a gynecologist. (2) An advanced registered nurse practitioner. (3) A physician assistant. 2. a. Notwithstanding the uniformity of treatment requirements of section 514C.6, a health carrier shall not deny coverage for covered benefits provided to a covered person solely on the basis that the covered personâs referral to receive the covered benefits was made by a primary care provider who does not participate in the health carrierâs provider network. b. A health carrier shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, or copayment for covered benefits for which a covered person was referred by the covered personâs primary care provider in excess of the deductible, coinsurance, or copayment applicable for the covered benefits had the covered person been referred by a health care professional that participates in the health carrierâs provider network. c. A health carrier may require a primary care provider to provide evidence that the primary care provider has executed a direct primary care agreement with the covered person, which evidence may include a written attestation or a copy of the executed direct primary care agreement. 3. This section applies to covered benefits for which a covered personâs primary care provider referred the covered person on or after July 1, 2026. House File 2434, p. 3 4. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2434, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor